Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5127YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2020 Section 1. Section 483A.27, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person born after January 1, 1972, shall not obtain a 3 hunting license unless the person has satisfactorily completed 4 a hunter education course approved by the commission. A person 5 who is eleven years of age or more older may enroll in an 6 approved hunter education course, but a person who is eleven 7 years of age and who has successfully completed the course 8 shall be issued a certificate of completion which that becomes 9 valid on the personâs twelfth birthday. A certificate of 10 completion from an approved hunter education course issued in 11 this state, or a certificate issued by another state, country, 12 or province or by a nationally recognized organization, 13 including the national rifle association, for completion of a 14 course that meets the standards adopted by the international 15 hunter education association ââ United States of America, is 16 valid for the requirements of this section . 17 Sec. 2. Section 483A.27, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person may satisfy the hunter 20 education requirements required under this section by 21 completing an online hunter education course offered or 22 approved by the department. Completion of an in-person field 23 day shall not be required for successful completion of the 24 course but may be offered by the department or the person 25 offering the course as an optional supplemental opportunity. 26